Utah statutes.
17-18-1.6.   Election of district attorney.

(1)  Each district attorney shall be elected at the regular general election beginning in November, 1994, or any regular general election year thereafter.

(2)  A district attorney shall hold office for four years, except as provided in Section 17-16-6, the term for which the district attorney is elected, beginning the first Monday of January following the election and until a successor is elected or appointed and qualified.

